Missouri, session 2026, SB1256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 400.8-110, 400.8-503, 400.8-511, and
400.9-305, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 400.8-110, 400.8-503,
400.8-511, and 400.9-305, to read as follows:
400.8-110. (a) The local law of the issuer's
jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (d), governs:
(1) The validity of a security;
(2) The rights and duties of the issuer with respect
to registration of transfer;
(3) The effectiveness of registration of transfer by
the issuer;
(4) Whether the issuer owes any duties to an adverse
claimant to a security; and
(5) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a
person to whom transfer of a certificated or uncertificated
security is registered or a person who obtains control of an
uncertificated security.
(b) The [local] law of [the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (e)] this state,
governs:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1256 2
(1) Acquisition of a security entitlement from the
securities intermediary;
(2) The rights and duties of the securities
intermediary and entitlement holder arising out of a
security entitlement;
(3) Whether the securities intermediary owes any
duties to an adverse claimant to a security entitlement; and
(4) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a
person who acquires a security entitlement from the
securities intermediary or a person who purchases a security
entitlement or interest therein from an entitlement holder.
(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which a
security certificate is located at the time of delivery
governs whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a
person to whom the security certificate is delivered.
(d) "Issuer's jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction
under which the issuer of the security is organized or, if
permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law of
another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer
organized under the law of this state may specify the law of
another jurisdiction as the law governing the matters
specified in subsection (a)(2) through (5).
[(e) The following rules determine a "securities
intermediary's jurisdiction" for purposes of this section:
(1) If an agreement between the securities
intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the
securities account expressly provides that a particular
jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction
for purposes of this part, this article, or chapter 400,
that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction;

SB 1256 3
(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement
between the securities intermediary and its entitlement
holder governing the securities account expressly provides
that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities
intermediary's jurisdiction.
(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2)
applies, and an agreement between the securities
intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the
securities account expressly provides that the securities
account is maintained at an office in a particular
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities
intermediary's jurisdiction;
(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the
securities intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction
in which the office identified in an account statement as
the office serving the entitlement holder's account is
located.
(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the
securities intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction
in which the chief executive office of the securities
intermediary is located.
(f) A securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not
determined by the physical location of certificates
representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction in
which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with
respect to which an entitlement holder has a security
entitlement, or by the location of facilities for data
processing or other record keeping concerning the account.]
400.8-503. (a) To the extent necessary for a
securities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements
with respect to a particular financial asset, all interests

SB 1256 4
in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary
are held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement
holders, are not property of the securities intermediary,
and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities
intermediary[, except as otherwise provided in section 400.8-
511].
(b) An entitlement holder's property interest with
respect to a particular financial asset under subsection (a)
is a pro rata property interest in all interests in that
financial asset held by the securities intermediary, without
regard to the time the entitlement holder acquired the
security entitlement or the time the securities intermediary
acquired the interest in that financial asset.
(c) An entitlement holder's property interest with
respect to a particular financial asset under subsection (a)
may be enforced against the securities intermediary only by
exercise of the entitlement holder's rights under sections
400.8-505 through 400.8-508.
(d) An entitlement holder's property interest with
respect to a particular financial asset under subsection (a)
may be enforced against a purchaser of the financial asset
or interest therein only if:
(1) Insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or
against the securities intermediary;
(2) The securities intermediary does not have
sufficient interests in the financial asset to satisfy the
security entitlements of all of its entitlement holders to
that financial asset;
(3) The securities intermediary violated its
obligations under section 400.8-504 by transferring the
financial asset or interest therein to the purchaser; and

SB 1256 5
(4) The purchaser is not protected under subsection
(e). The trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of
all entitlement holders having security entitlements with
respect to a particular financial asset, may recover the
financial asset, or interest therein, from the purchaser.
If the trustee or other liquidator elects not to pursue that
right, an entitlement holder whose security entitlement
remains unsatisfied has the right to recover its interest in
the financial asset from the purchaser.
(e) An action based on the entitlement holder's
property interest with respect to a particular financial
asset under subsection (a), whether framed in conversion,
replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien or other
theory, may not be asserted against any purchaser of a
financial asset or interest therein who gives value, obtains
control, and does not act in collusion with the securities
intermediary in violating the securities intermediary's
obligations under section 400.8-504.
400.8-511. [(a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (b) and (c),] If a securities intermediary does
not have sufficient interests in a particular financial
asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders
who have security entitlements to that financial asset and
its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary
who has a security interest in that financial asset, the
claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor, have
priority over the claim of the creditor.
[(b) A claim of a creditor of a securities
intermediary who has a security interest in a financial
asset held by a securities intermediary has priority over
claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders
who have security entitlements with respect to that

SB 1256 6
financial asset if the creditor has control over the
financial asset.
(c) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient
financial assets to satisfy both its obligations to
entitlement holders who have security entitlements with
respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a
creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security
interest in that financial asset, the claim of the creditor
has priority over the claims of entitlement holders.]
400.9-305. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (c), the following rules apply:
(1) While a security certificate is located in a
jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and
the priority of a security interest in the certificated
security represented thereby;
(2) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction as
specified in section 400.8-110(d) governs perfection, the
effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a
security interest in an uncertificated security;
(3) The [local] law of [the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction as specified in section 400.8-110(e)] this
state governs perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a
security entitlement or securities account;
(4) The local law of the commodity intermediary's
jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a
commodity contract or commodity account.
(b) The following rules determine a commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part:

SB 1256 7
(1) If an agreement between the commodity intermediary
and commodity customer governing the commodity account
expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this
part, this article, or this chapter, that jurisdiction is
the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction;
(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement
between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer
governing the commodity account expressly provides that the
agreement is governed by the law of a particular
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction;
(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies
and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and
commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly
provides that the commodity account is maintained at an
office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is
the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction;
(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in
which the office identified in an account statement as the
office serving the commodity customer's account is located;
(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in
which the chief executive office of the commodity
intermediary is located.
(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the
debtor is located governs:
(1) Perfection of a security interest in investment
property by filing;

SB 1256 8
(2) Automatic perfection of a security interest in
investment property created by a broker or securities
intermediary; and
(3) Automatic perfection of a security interest in a
commodity contract or commodity account created by a
commodity intermediary.
✓